Washington statutes.
RCW 43.166.030

Powers. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

(1) State lands development authorities have the power to:

(a) Accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public and private entities;

(b) Employ and appoint such agents, attorneys, officers, and employees as may be necessary to implement its purposes and duties;

(c) Contract and enter into partnerships with individuals, associations, corporations, and local, state, and federal governments;

(d) Buy, own, and lease real and personal property;

(e) Sell real and personal property, subject to any rules and restrictions contained in the proposal to establish a state lands development authority under RCW 43.166.010;

(f) Hold in trust, improve, and develop land;

(g) Invest, deposit, and reinvest its funds;

(h) Incur debt in furtherance of its mission: Provided, however, that state lands development authorities are expressly prohibited from incurring debt on behalf of the state of Washington as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution. A state lands development authority obligation to repay borrowed money does not constitute an obligation, either general, special, or moral, of the state of Washington. State lands development authorities are expressly prohibited from using, either directly or indirectly, "general state revenues" as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution to satisfy any state lands development authority obligation to repay borrowed money;

(i) Lend or grant its funds for any lawful purposes. For purposes of this section, "lawful purposes" includes without limitation, any use of funds, including loans thereof to public or private parties, authorized by agreements with the United States or any department or agency thereof under which federal or private funds are obtained, or authorized under federal laws and regulations pertinent to such agreements; and

(j) Exercise such additional powers as may be authorized by law.

(2) A state lands development authority that accepts public funds under subsection (1)(a) of this section:

(a) Is subject in all respects to Article VIII, section 5 or 7, as appropriate, of the state Constitution, and RCW 42.17A.550; and

(b) May not use such funds to support or oppose a candidate, ballot proposition, political party, or political committee.

(3) State lands development authorities do not have any authority to levy taxes or assessments.

[ 2022 c 259 s 3.]

PDFRCW 43.166.030

Powers. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) State lands development authorities have the power to:

(a) Accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public and private entities;

(b) Employ and appoint such agents, attorneys, officers, and employees as may be necessary to implement its purposes and duties;

(c) Contract and enter into partnerships with individuals, associations, corporations, and local, state, and federal governments;

(d) Buy, own, and lease real and personal property;

(e) Sell real and personal property, subject to any rules and restrictions contained in the proposal to establish a state lands development authority under RCW 43.166.010;

(f) Hold in trust, improve, and develop land;

(g) Invest, deposit, and reinvest its funds;

(h) Incur debt in furtherance of its mission: Provided, however, that state lands development authorities are expressly prohibited from incurring debt on behalf of the state of Washington as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution. A state lands development authority obligation to repay borrowed money does not constitute an obligation, either general, special, or moral, of the state of Washington. State lands development authorities are expressly prohibited from using, either directly or indirectly, "general state revenues" as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution to satisfy any state lands development authority obligation to repay borrowed money;

(i) Lend or grant its funds for any lawful purposes. For purposes of this section, "lawful purposes" includes without limitation, any use of funds, including loans thereof to public or private parties, authorized by agreements with the United States or any department or agency thereof under which federal or private funds are obtained, or authorized under federal laws and regulations pertinent to such agreements; and

(j) Exercise such additional powers as may be authorized by law.

(2) A state lands development authority that accepts public funds under subsection (1)(a) of this section:

(a) Is subject in all respects to Article VIII, section 5 or 7, as appropriate, of the state Constitution, and RCW 29B.40.250; and

(b) May not use such funds to support or oppose a candidate, ballot proposition, political party, or political committee.

(3) State lands development authorities do not have any authority to levy taxes or assessments.

[ 2024 c 164 s 525; 2022 c 259 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.